Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.090

Records—Audits.

The board and the department shall keep proper records of accounts and shall be subject to audit by the state auditor.

[ 1996 c 51 s 8; 1987 c 505 s 42; 1982 1st ex.s. c 40 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1996 c 51: See notes following RCW 43.160.010.